somali.xfst
gabɖta -> gaβaɖa
vowel insertion - gabaɖta
Spirantization - gaβaɖta
t-deletion - gaβaɖa
(doesn't change)

define Consonants b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z | ɖ | ʃ | ɣ | β | ð | ʐ | h̵;
define Vowels a | e | i | o | u;

define MFinalTransformation m -> n || _[.#. | ta .#. | taj .#. | naj .#.];

define LAssimilation ln -> ll || _aj .#.;

define VowelEpenthesisA [..] -> a || Consonants a Consonants _ Consonants [.#. | ta .#. | taj .#. | naj .#.];
define VowelEpenthesisE [..] -> e || Consonants e Consonants _ Consonants [.#. | ta .#. | taj .#. | naj .#.];
define VowelEpenthesisI [..] -> i || Consonants i Consonants _ Consonants [.#. | ta .#. | taj .#. | naj .#.];
define VowelEpenthesisO [..] -> o || Consonants o Consonants _ Consonants [.#. | ta .#. | taj .#. | naj .#.];
define VowelEpenthesisU [..] -> u || Consonants u Consonants _ Consonants [.#. | ta .#. | taj .#. | naj .#.];

define Spirantization g -> ɣ, b -> β, d -> ð, ɖ -> ʐ || Vowels _ Vowels;
define TDeletion dt -> d, ɖt -> ɖ, ʃt -> ʃ || Vowels _ a .#.;
define ShaTransformation lt -> ʃ || _ [a | aj];

read regex MFinalTransformation .o. LAssimilation .o. VowelEpenthesisA .o. VowelEpenthesisE .o. VowelEpenthesisI .o. VowelEpenthesisO .o. VowelEpenthesisU .o. Spirantization .o. TDeletion .o. ShaTransformation;

daar,daarta,daaro,house
daar,daarta,daaro

gees,geesta,geeso,side
gees, geesta, geeso

laf,lafta,lafo,bone
laf, lafta, lafo

lug,lugta,luɣo,leg
lug, lugta, lugo

naag,naagta,naaɣo,woman
naag, naagta, naago

tib,tibta,tiβo,pestle
tib, tibta, tibo

sab,sabta,saβo,outcast
sab, sabta, sabo

bad,bada,baðo,sea
bad, badta, bado - fuck

d͡ʒid,d͡ʒida,d͡ʒiðo,person
d͡ʒid, d͡ʒidta, d͡ʒido

feeɖ,feeɖa,feeʐo,rib
feeɖ, feeɖta, feeɖo

ʕiir,ʕiirta,ʕiiro,buttermilk
ʕiir, ʕiirta, ʕiiro

ʔul,ʔuʃa,ʔulo,stick
ʔul, ʔulta, ʔulo

bil,biʃa,bilo,month
bil, bilta, bilo

meel,meeʃa,meelo,place
meel, meelta, meelo

kaliil,kaliiʃa,kaliilo,summer
kaliil, kaliilta, kaliilo

najl,najʃa,najlo,female lamb
najl, najlta, najlo

sun,sunta,sumo,poison
sum, sumta, sumo

laan,laanta,laamo,branch
laam, laamta, laamo

sin,sinta,simo,hip
sim, simta, simo

dan,danta,dano,affair
dan, danta, dano

daan,daanta,daano,river bank
daan, daanta, daano

saan,saanta,saano,hide
saan, saanta, saano

nirig,nirigta,nirgo,babj female camel
nirg, nirgta, nirgo

gaβaɖ,gaβaɖa,gabɖo,girl - here
gabɖ, gabɖta, gabɖo

hoɣol,hoɣoʃa,hoglo,downpour
hogl, hoglta, hoglo

baɣal,baɣaʃa,baglo,mule
bagl, baglta, baglo

wah̵ar,wah̵arta,wah̵aro,female kid
wah̵ar, wah̵arta, wah̵aro

irbad,irbada,irbaðo,needle
irbad, irbadta, irbado

kefed,kefeda,kefeðo,pan
kefed, kefedta, kefedo

d͡ʒilin,d͡ʒilinta,d͡ʒilino,female dwarf
d͡ʒilin, d͡ʒilinta, d͡ʒilino

bohol,bohoʃa,boholo,hole
bohol, boholta, boholo

jirid,jirida,jirdo,trunk
jird, jirdta, jirdo

ʔaajad,ʔaajada,ʔaajaðo,miracle
ʔaajad, ʔaajadta, ʔaajado

gaʕan,gaʕanta,gaʕmo,hand
gaʕm, gaʕmta, gaʕmo

ʔinan,ʔinanta,ʔinano,daughter
ʔinan, ʔinanta, ʔinano

suɣaj,sugtaj,sugnaj,wait
sugaj, sugtaj, sugnaj

kaβaj,kabtaj,kabnaj,fix
kabaj, kabtaj, kabnaj

siðaj,sidaj,sidnaj,carry
sidaj, sidtaj, sidnaj

dilaj,diʃaj,dillaj,kill
dilaj, diltaj, dilnaj

ganaj,gantaj,gannaj,aim
ganaj, gantaj, gannaj

tumaj,tuntaj,tunnaj,hammer
tumaj, tumtaj, tumnaj

argaj,aragtaj,aragnaj,see
argaj, argtaj, argnaj

gudbaj,guðubtaj,guðubnaj,cross a river
gudbaj, gudbtaj, gudbnaj

qoslaj,qosoʃaj,qosollaj,laugh
qoslaj, qosltaj, qoslnaj

hadlaj,haðaʃaj,haðallaj,talk
hadlaj, hadltaj, hadlnaj
